Utah statutes.
10-2-614.   Ordinances, resolutions, and orders.
All ordinances, resolutions and orders, in force in any of the municipalities
when it is consolidated, shall remain in full force and effect within the
respective areas of the municipalities which existed prior to consolidation
insofar as the ordinances, resolutions and orders are not repugnant to law,
until repealed or amended, but may not in any case exceed three years.  The
governing body of the new municipality shall as soon as possible adopt new
ordinances, resolutions and orders for the uniform governance of the new
municipality.
